Hawaii statutes.
[§323G-3]
Noninterference with existing health care directives. Nothing in this
chapter shall be construed to interfere with the rights of an agent operating
under a valid health care directive under section 327E-3 or confer upon the
caregiver any authority to make health care decisions on behalf of the patient
unless the caregiver is designated as an agent in a health care directive under
section 327E-3. [L 2016, c 69, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next